Utah statutes.
17-36-44.   Financial administration ordinance -- Required provisions.

The financial administration ordinance, adopted pursuant to Section 17-36-43, shall provide:

(1)  a maximum amount over which purchases may not be made without the approval of the county executive;

(2)  that the financial officer be bonded for a reasonable amount; and

(3)  any other provisions the county legislative body considers advisable.

